Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.100

Electronic access to legislative information.

The legislature and legislative agencies through the administrative committee, shall:

(1) Continue to plan for and implement processes for making legislative information available electronically;

(2) Promote and facilitate electronic access to the public of legislative information and services;

(3) Establish technical standards for such services;

(4) Consider electronic public access needs when planning new information systems or major upgrades of information systems;

(5) Develop processes to determine which legislative information the public most wants and needs;

(6) Increase capabilities to receive information electronically from the public and transmit forms, applications and other communications and transactions electronically;

(7) Use technologies that allow continuous access twenty-four hours a day, seven days per week, involve little or no cost to access, and are capable of being used by persons without extensive technology ability; and

(8) Consider and incorporate wherever possible ease of access to electronic technologies by persons with disabilities.

[ 2020 c 114 s 16; 1996 c 171 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.

Captions not law—Effective dates—1996 c 171: See notes following RCW 2.68.050.